Virginia statutes. Title 32.1. Health.
Article 2. Maternal and Child Health Services and
Crippled Children’s Services.

§ 32.1-77.
State plans for maternal and child health services and children’s specialty services.

The Board is authorized to prepare, amend from time to time and submit to the Secretary of the United States Department of Health and Human Services, state plans for maternal and child health services and children’s specialty services pursuant to Title V of the United States Social Security Act and any amendments thereto.

The Commissioner is authorized to administer such plans and to receive and expend federal funds for the administration thereof in accordance with applicable federal and state laws and regulations.

History.

Code 1950, § 32-165; 1979, c. 711; 1987, c. 427.

Law Review.

For survey of Virginia law on governmental services and social welfare for the year 1978-1979, see 66 Va. L. Rev. 301 (1980).

§ 32.1-77.1.
State-certified doulas; certification.

As used in this section, “state-certified doula” means a trained, community-based nonmedical professional who provides continuous physical, emotional, and informational support to a pregnant person during the antepartum or intrapartum period or during the period up to one year postpartum and who has been certified by a body approved by the Board for such purpose in accordance with the provisions of this section.

No person shall use or assume the title “state-certified doula” unless such person is a community-based doula who (i) has received training and education as a doula from an entity approved by a body approved by the Board for such purpose and (ii) has been certified as a doula by a body approved by the Board for such purpose.

No entity shall hold itself out as providing training and education necessary to meet the requirements of clause (i) of subsection B unless its curriculum and training program has been approved by a body approved by the Board for such purpose.

The Board shall adopt regulations setting forth the requirements for (i) use of the title “state-certified doula” and (ii) training and education necessary to satisfy the requirements for certification by the Department as a state-certified doula.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection B, a person who is certified by a national credentialing organization that is approved by a body approved by the Board for such purpose who does not meet the requirements of clause (i) of subsection B shall also be eligible for state certification.

Certification requirements for state-certified doulas shall reflect national best practices pertaining to community-based doula training and certification.

The Department shall make a registry of state-certified doulas in the Commonwealth available to the public through a body approved by the Board to certify doulas. The Department shall also make a list of entities approved to provide training and education necessary to meet the requirements of clause (i) of subsection B available to the public through a body approved by the Board to certify doulas.

Nothing in this section shall prohibit any person from practicing as a doula in the Commonwealth, regardless of whether such person is certified in accordance with the provisions of this section.

History.

2020, c. 724.

§ 32.1-78.
Reporting information about children with health problems or handicapping conditions.

Notwithstanding §

32.1-271

or any other law to the contrary, the Commissioner shall report to the Superintendent of Public Instruction or to the appropriate school division superintendent within the Commonwealth the identity of, and pertinent information about, children with health problems or handicapping conditions which might affect the child’s career in school and his need for special education.

History.

Code 1950, § 32-11.1; 1972, c. 431; 1979, c. 711.